Utah statutes.
39-4-2.   Governor to prescribe rules and regulations.

The governor is authorized to prescribe rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of this act governing the enlistment, organization, administration, equipment, maintenance, training and discipline of such forces: Provided, such rules and regulations, in so far as he deems practicable and desirable, shall conform to existing law governing and pertaining to the National Guard and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder and shall prohibit the acceptance of gifts, donations, gratuities or anything of value by such forces or by any member of such forces from any individual, firm, association or corporation by reason of such membership.



No Change Since 1953

